Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.222

Professional gambling in the third degree.

(1) A person is guilty of professional gambling in the third degree if he or she engages in, or knowingly causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to engage in professional gambling as defined in this chapter, and:

(a) His or her conduct does not constitute first or second degree professional gambling;

(b) He or she operates any of the unlicensed gambling activities authorized by this chapter in a manner other than as prescribed by this chapter; or

(c) He or she is directly employed in but not managing or directing any gambling operation.

(2) This section shall not apply to those activities enumerated in RCW 9.46.0305 through 9.46.0361 or to any acts in furtherance of such activities when conducted in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Professional gambling in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor subject to the penalty established in RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 1994 c 218 s 13; 1991 c 261 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 218: See note following RCW 9.46.010.